Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2108
Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards; meetings; subject to Administrative Procedure Act.

The Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards shall meet at such times and places as necessary to carry out its duties under the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act and sections 39-2101 to 39-2125. The board shall be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1969, c. 312, § 8, p. 1123;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 17.
July 1, 2026
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.